th: วัสดุฐานสโนว์บอร์ด: เอกซ์ทรูด; เอกซ์ทรูด 2000; ไฮเปอร์ดรายฟ์; ควอนตัมไดรฟ์; ซินเตอร์; ซินเตอร์ 4000; ซินเตอร์ 6000; ซินเตอร์ 8000; TNT; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Materijal za bazu snowboarda: Ekstrudirano; Ekstrudirano 2000; Hyperdrive; Quantum Drive; Sinterirano; Sinterirano 4000; Sinterirano 6000; Sinterirano 8000; TNT; Ostalo
cs: Základní materiál snowboardu: Extrudovaná; Extrudovaná 2000; Hyperdrive; Quantum Drive; Sintrovaná; Sintrovaná 4000; Sintrovaná 6000; Sintrovaná 8000; TNT; Jiné
sv: Snowboard – basmaterial: Extruderad; Extruderad 2000; Hyperdrive; Quantum Drive; Sintrad; Sintrad 4000; Sintrad 6000; Sintrad 8000; TNT; Övrigt
vi: Vật liệu đế ván trượt tuyết: Ép đùn; Ép đùn 2000; Hyperdrive; Quantum Drive; Thiêu kết; Thiêu kết 4000; Thiêu kết 6000; Thiêu kết 8000; TNT; Khác
hu: Snowboard alapanyaga: Extrudált; Extrudált 2000; Hyperdrive; Quantum Drive; Szinterezett; Szinterezett 4000; Szinterezett 6000; Szinterezett 8000; TNT; Egyéb
zh-CN: 单板滑雪板板底材质: 挤压底; 挤压底 2000; Hyperdrive 烧结底; Quantum Drive; 烧结底; 烧结底 4000; 烧结底 6000; 烧结底 8000; TNT; 其他
nb: Snowboard-basemateriale: Ekstrudert; Ekstrudert 2000; Hyperdrive; Quantum Drive; Sintret; Sintret 4000; Sintret 6000; Sintret 8000; TNT; Annet
bg-BG: Основен материал за сноуборд: Екструдиран; Екструдиран 2000; Hyperdrive; Quantum Drive; Синтерован; Синтерован 4000; Синтерован 6000; Синтерован 8000; TNT; Друго
sk-SK: Materiál sklznice snowboardu: Extrudovaná; Extrudovaná 2000; Hyperdrive; Quantum Drive; Sintrovaná; Sintrovaná 4000; Sintrovaná 6000; Sintrovaná 8000; TNT; Iné
tr: Snowboard taban malzemesi: Ekstrüde; Ekstrüde 2000; Hyperdrive; Quantum Drive; Sinterlenmiş; Sinterlenmiş 4000; Sinterlenmiş 6000; Sinterlenmiş 8000; TNT; Diğer
lt-LT: Snieglentės pagrindo medžiaga: Ekstrudinis; Ekstrudinis 2000; „Hyperdrive“; „Quantum Drive“; Sukepintas; Sukepintas 4000; Sukepintas 6000; Sukepintas 8000; TNT; Kita
da: Snowboardbasemateriale: Ekstruderet; Ekstruderet 2000; Hyperdrive; Quantum Drive; Sinteret; Sinteret 4000; Sinteret 6000; Sinteret 8000; TNT; Andet
fi: Lumilaudan pohjamateriaali: Ekstrudoitu; Ekstrudoitu 2000; Hyperdrive; Quantum Drive; Sintrattu; Sintrattu 4000; Sintrattu 6000; Sintrattu 8000; TNT; Muu
pt-PT: Material da base da prancha de snowboard: Extrudida; Extrudida 2000; Hyperdrive; Quantum Drive; Sinterizada; Sinterizada 4000; Sinterizada 6000; Sinterizada 8000; TNT; Outro
es: Material base para snowboard: Extruido; Extruido 2000; Hyperdrive; Quantum Drive; Sinterizado; Sinterizado 4000; Sinterizado 6000; Sinterizado 8000; TNT; Otro
pl: Materiał ślizgu deski snowboardowej: Tłoczony; Tłoczony 2000; Hyperdrive; Quantum Drive; Spiekany; Spiekany 4000; Spiekany 6000; Spiekany 8000; TNT; Inny
el: Υλικό βάσης για σνόουμπορντ: Διελασμένο; Διελασμένο 2000; Hyperdrive; Quantum Drive; Sintered; Sintered 4000; Sintered 6000; Sintered 8000; TNT; Άλλο
ru: Материал скользящей поверхности сноуборда: Экструдированный; Экструдированный 2000; Hyperdrive; Quantum Drive; Спечённый; Спечённый 4000; Спечённый 6000; Спечённый 8000; TNT; Другое
ro-RO: Material al bazei snowboardului: Extrudat; Extrudat 2000; Hyperdrive; Quantum Drive; Sinterizat; Sinterizat 4000; Sinterizat 6000; Sinterizat 8000; TNT; Altele
pt-BR: Snowboard base material: Extrudada; Extrudada 2000; Hyperdrive; Quantum Drive; Sinterizada; Sinterizada 4000; Sinterizada 6000; Sinterizada 8000; TNT; Outro
de: Belagsmaterial des Snowboards: Extrudiert; Extrudiert 2000; Hyperdrive; Quantum Drive; Gesintert; Gesintert 4000; Gesintert 6000; Gesintert 8000; TNT; Andere
en: Snowboard base material: Extruded; Extruded 2000; Hyperdrive; Quantum Drive; Sintered; Sintered 4000; Sintered 6000; Sintered 8000; TNT; Other
sl-SI: Material drsne ploskve deske za sneg: Ekstrudirano; Ekstrudirano 2000; Hyperdrive; Quantum Drive; Sintran; Sintran 4000; Sintran 6000; Sintran 8000; TNT; Drugo
zh-TW: 滑雪板底材質: 擠壓板底; 擠壓 2000; Hyperdrive; Quantum Drive; 燒結板底; 燒結 4000; 燒結 6000; 燒結 8000; TNT; 其他
ja: スノーボードベース素材: エクストルーデッド; エクストルーデッド 2000; Hyperdrive; Quantum Drive; シンタード; シンタード 4000; シンタード 6000; シンタード 8000; TNT; その他
it: Materiale di base snowboard: Estrusa; Estrusa 2000; Hyperdrive; Quantum Drive; Sinterizzata; Sinterizzata 4000; Sinterizzata 6000; Sinterizzata 8000; TNT; Altro
nl: Snowboard belagmateriaal: Geëxtrudeerd; Geëxtrudeerd 2000; Hyperdrive; Quantum Drive; Gesinterd; Gesinterd 4000; Gesinterd 6000; Gesinterd 8000; TNT; Anders
fr: Matériau de la semelle du snowboard: Extrudé; Extrudé 2000; Hyperdrive; Quantum Drive; Fritté; Fritté 4000; Fritté 6000; Fritté 8000; TNT; Autre
ko: 스노보드 베이스 소재: 익스트루디드; 익스트루디드 2000; 하이퍼드라이브; 퀀텀 드라이브; 신터드; 신터드 4000; 신터드 6000; 신터드 8000; TNT; 기타